Louisiana, session 2026, HB501.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1104(F) and 1104.3 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1104. Duties and powers of the commissioner; rules and regulations; permits
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, Class VI injection
wells shall not be permitted in any parish where prohibited pursuant to the local
option procedure set forth in this Chapter.
* * *
§1104.3. Local option; Allen Parish
The governing authority of Allen Parish may by resolution or ordinance
determine whether Class VI injection wells may be permitted within the parish. A
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-578 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 501
copy of any resolution or ordinance passed for this purpose shall be provided to the
department.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.